North Carolina, session 2025, SB608.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 108A-24 reads as rewritten:
"§ 108A-24. Definitions.
As used in Chapter 108A:
…
(3c) "Family" means a unit consisting of a minor child or children and one or more
of their biological parents, adoptive parents, stepparents, or grandparents
living together. For purposes of the Work First Program, family also includes
a pregnant woman, blood or half-blood relative or adoptive relative limited to
brother, sister, great-grandparent, great-great-grandparent, uncle, aunt,
great-uncle, great-aunt, great-great-uncle, great-great-aunt, nephew, niece,
first cousin, stepbrother, and stepsister.
…
(15) "Work First Family Assistance" is a program of time-limited periodic
payments to assist in maintaining the children of eligible families while the
adult family members engage in activities to prepare for entering and to enter
the workplace.
…."
SECTION 2. G.S. 108A-27.01 reads as rewritten:
"§ 108A-27.01. Income eligibility and payment level for Work First Family Assistance.
The maximum net family annual income eligibility standards for Work First Family
Assistance are as provided in the table below. shall be equal to seventy-five percent (75%) of the
federal poverty level for the applicable family size. The payment level for Work First Family
Assistance shall be fifty percent (50%) of the standard of need.forty percent (40%) of the federal
poverty level for the applicable family size.
Family Income
Size Level
1 $ 4,344
2 5,664
*S608-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
3 6,528
4 7,128
5 7,776
6 8,376
7 8,952
8 9,256"
SECTION 3. Part 2 of Article 2 of Chapter 108A of the General Statutes is amended
by adding a new section to read:
"§ 108A-27.02. Resource limits.
The resources of a person or family for cash assistance shall not exceed five thousand dollars
($5,000). However, the equity value of one vehicle per family shall not be counted as a resource
of the family if the vehicle is used for work, training, or education in preparation for employment
or a job search; provided, further that an exclusion in the amount of four thousand six hundred
fifty dollars ($4,650) of the equity value of one additional vehicle is allowed."
SECTION 4. G.S. 108A-27.1 reads as rewritten:
"§ 108A-27.1. Time limitations on assistance.
(a) Under the Standard Work First Program, unless an extension or an exemption is
provided pursuant to the provisions of the Part or the State Plan, any cash assistance provided to
a person or family in the employment program shall only be provided for a cumulative total of
24 months. After having received cash assistance for 24 months, the person or the family may
reapply for cash assistance, but not until after 36 months from the last month the person or the
family received cash assistance. This subsection shall not apply to child-only cases.
(b) Electing Counties may set any time limitations on assistance it finds appropriate, so
long as the time limitations do not conflict with or exceed any federal time limitations.
The State shall not impose any time limitations on eligible families receiving Work First
Family Assistance, except for those time limitations set by federal law or regulations."
SECTION 5. This act is effective when it becomes law.
Page 2 Senate Bill 608-First Edition